Utah statutes.
63M-6-202.   Location of easements.

(1)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development or its designees may acquire easements on the land within the following boundaries:

(a)  beginning on the north Hill Air Force Base accident potential zone (APZ) at a point which is North 1,089,743.170 meters and East 459,346.946 meters based on the North zone, State of Utah, NAD 83 coordinates and runs north to North 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, East 457.109 meters, North 26 degrees 49 minutes 16 seconds, West 3,352.129 meters, South 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, West 914.217 meters, South 26 degrees 49 minutes 16 seconds, East 3,352.129 meters, North 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, East 457.109 meters back to the point of beginning; and

(b)  beginning on the south Hill Air Force Base APZ which is North 1,086,065.786 meters and East 461,206.222 meters based on the North zone, State of Utah, NAD 83 coordinates and runs South 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, West 457.109 meters, South 26 degrees 49 minutes 16 seconds, East 502.179 meters, South 0 degrees 20 minutes 35 seconds, West 1,722.227 meters, South 89 degrees 39 minutes 25 seconds, East 883.743 meters, North 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, East 914.217 meters, North 26 degrees 49 minutes 16 seconds, West 2,437.912 meters, South 63 degrees 10 minutes 44 seconds, West 457.109 meters back to the point of beginning.

(2)  The Governor's Office of Economic Development or its designees may acquire easements on the following land that is located inside the 75 and 80 level day-night (LDN) noise contour as identified in the Hill Air Force Base AICUZ Land Use Compatibility Guidelines Study, as amended, dated October, 1982:

(a)  in the west half of Section 3, T4NR1W;

(b)  in the east half of Section 4, T4NR1W;

(c)  in the northeast quarter of Section 8, T4NR1W;

(d)  within all of Section 9, T4NR1W;

(e)  in the northwest quarter of Section 10, T4NR1W;

(f)  within the southwest quarter of Section 19, T5NR1W;

(g)  in the south half of Section 20, T5NR1W;

(h)  within the southwest quarter of Section 28, T5NR1W; and

(i)  within Section 29, T5NR1W.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

